ro_RO.dic
aclimatare/A
acord/C
acriș/c
acvilon/c
adultă/A
advon/M
aeraj/c
aerodrom/C
afrikaans/c
agramatism/C
alanină/A
albastru/C
albinism/c
alfatron/M
aliotman/c
alișveriș/C
aluminium/c
ambiție/A
amidon/C
amino/c
amvon/M
analitism/c
androgeneză/A
anexionism/c
animal/M
ansamblu/C
anticlericalism/c
antielectron/c
antifon/M
antijunimism/c
antiputridă/A
antiradar/c
antivedetism/c
antresol/C
apartheid/c
apret/c
apropo/C
arabă/A
argentit/c
arhiloc/C
ariston/M
aritenoid/c
artritism/c
aseptizare/A
asfințit/C
astatiniu/c
atonalism/c
audiofon/M
autoaccidentare/A
autocontrol/C
autoexamen/c
autofurgon/M
autoșasiu/C
avanpremieră/A
aventurism/c
aviofon/M
axion/M
azbest/C
bairamlâc/C
balcon/M
bandoneon/M
banjo/C
baptistă/A
barbișon/M
baron/M
barotraumatism/c
bason/M
baston/M
batiu/C
baton/M
bendix/C
berton/M
beton/M
biatlon/M
bideu/C
bidimensionalitate/A
bidon/M
bilon/M
bimetalism/c
biofond/C
bivuac/C
blochaus/C
bluzon/M
boarță/A
bodicec/C
bombon/M
bonapartism/c
bongos/C
botei/C
breton/M
bric/C
brio/c
bronhială/A
bubon/M
bucluc/C
bulon/M
bungalou/C
bust/C
butisă/A
buton/M
băcan/c
cablu/C
caboșon/M
calcinare/A
caldarâm/C
calico/c
campion/M
canibalism/c
canion/M
cant/C
canton/M
capon/M
capsulare/A
carbogen/c
carcinotron/M
careu/C
carnotit/c
casetofon/M
castron/M
catar/C
catedrală/A
caviar/c
ceai/C
cenotip/C
centenar/M
centon/M
centralism/c
cesionară/A
chaos/C
charleston/c
cheson/M
chichion/M
chiclaz/C
chirăit/C
chiton/M
cianogen/c
ciclotron/M
cier/C
cilindrată/A
ciot/C
citrin/c
clac/C
clanță/A
clic/C
clistron/M
clor/c
clăncăit/C
cocoșare/A
coferdam/C
colbertism/c
colon/M
comando/C
combinezon/M
comemorativă/A
comision/M
comor/c
comperaj/M
con/C
condensabilitate/A
conservatorism/c
consternantă/A
cont/C
convențională/A
convoi/C
cordon/M
corindon/c
corp/C
cosecantă/A
cosmotron/M
cotilion/M
coș/C
coșaveraj/M
creion/M
creton/M
cripton/c
cristalin/C
crocantă/A
cronometraj/M
crupon/M
crușon/M
cucon/M
cuconet/C
cupon/M
curculionidă/A
curs/C
cvintilion/M
câști/C
cărucioară/A
dadaism/c
dam/C
decagon/M
decapod/C
decatlon/M
decentă/A
defetism/c
deformată/A
delco/C
demontare/A
dermapteră/A
descâlcit/C
desinit/c
desperechere/A
dezertare/A
dezgheț/C
diapazon/M
dicton/M
diformă/A
digitron/c
dineu/C
dispersională/A
dodecagon/M
dol/C
donchihotism/c
donjon/M
doxologie/A
dribling/C
dublou/C
durilon/M
duumvirat/c
dăunată/A
ecuson/M
egocentrism/c
electrodiagnoză/A
electrodinam/C
eleron/M
elodion/M
embolit/c
endecagon/M
eneolitic/c
engolpion/M
enterală/A
erg/C
ergotism/c
escadron/M
escrocherie/A
etalon/M
etos/c
exactitate/A
exagon/M
exorcism/c
expurgare/A
eșalon/M
faeton/M
fald/C
fanerogamistă/A
fanion/M
faringism/c
farmazon/M
fazitron/M
felon/M
feroaluminiu/c
fibroasă/A
fibrom/C
fisc/c
flacon/M
flashback/C
fluență/A
folclorism/c
fototelefon/M
fovism/c
frapată/A
fratricid/C
fumegai/c
fundal/M
fustă/A
gaiacol/c
galion/M
galop/C
genecologie/A
generativism/c
gerg/C
getinax/c
gheridon/M
ghioș/C
giravion/M
glaf/C
glastră/A
gomaj/c
gonfalon/M
grajd/C
greșită/A
grădinărit/c
gudron/M
gust/C
habenulă/A
handbal/c
hang/C
heliotactism/c
hemistih/C
heptagon/M
hetairă/A
hidrobion/M
hieratism/c
hipoacuzie/A
hit/c
hlei/C
humărie/A
hursuzlâc/c
huzmet/C
idiomorfism/c
ighemonicon/M
ileus/C
ilimitată/A
ilustrativism/c
imunoglobulină/A
inconfort/c
indigestă/A
injoncțiune/A
interdigitală/A
interlock/c
intrados/C
invertită/A
ionofon/M
iredentism/c
izomorfism/c
izomorfă/A
jambon/M
jar/C
jurnal/M
juvaier/C
jăratec/c
laborantă/A
lamarckism/c
lampion/M
lapiaz/C
lemnărit/c
lenitivă/A
leucom/C
lila/c
lină/A
litotamniu/C
longeron/M
lotrit/c
lumânărărie/A
lupon/M
lăcaș/C
lăcărit/c
magniflex/c
mahon/M
maimuțărită/A
mandibulate/C
manioc/c
maraton/M
marulă/A
mașiculiu/C
mecanicism/c
megafon/M
memorabilitate/A
mendeleeviu/c
mestecăniș/C
metal/M
metiloranj/c
microdeltă/A
microsion/M
mihrab/C
miniavion/M
minifotbal/c
minologhion/M
miroznă/A
mitologism/c
mișmaș/C
monitorizată/A
monocotiledon/M
monofoto/c
morganism/c
moto/C
moșmon/M
mucava/A
murgit/c
muștar/C
mângâiere/A
naftalen/c
nautofon/M
neacceptabilă/A
neacord/C
neastâmpăr/c
nedospită/A
neohegelianism/c
neomalthusianistă/A
neprofesionism/c
nevoiașă/A
nitragin/c
nizam/C
noțională/A
oblon/M
obscurantism/c
obsesională/A
obtuzunghi/C
odgon/M
oloiniță/A
omeomorfism/c
omucid/C
orchestrion/M
orfism/c
orhestră/A
osianism/c
osteofon/M
osteosarcom/C
oțerită/A
paleofon/M
palisaj/c
pallium/C
paos/c
parafare/A
parching/C
parsism/c
patagonă/A
patefon/M
pauperism/c
pelosol/C
pension/M
perceptibilă/A
perfectism/c
perigon/M
pertinax/c
pesref/C
pestoasă/A
pinion/M
piper/C
pirometamorfism/c
piston/M
pistă/A
planton/M
plebeianism/c
plesiotip/C
plocon/M
plumieră/A
plurisemantism/c
poanson/M
podium/C
poligon/M
polisemie/A
polisintetism/c
popou/C
populism/c
portcreion/M
potcașă/A
praf/C
preclasicism/c
prefirare/A
prezervare/A
prigon/M
prilej/C
prizonierat/c
profeție/A
pronaos/C
pronomion/c
proxenetism/c
prozatoare/A
psalterion/M
pufăit/c
puls/C
purină/A
pătucean/C
quattrocento/c
rabotată/A
radiojurnal/M
rafaelism/c
raion/M
rapel/C
reabdică/A
reaieptare/A
reaplatizată/A
reautodiagnosticată/A
rebosumflată/A
recapsulată/A
rechizitor/c
recivilizare/A
reconfecționare/A
rectificare/A
redecernare/A
redeparazitare/A
redesulfonare/A
redomirită/A
reepicizare/A
refabricare/A
reflux/C
refoșcăită/A
regletă/A
rehuzdupare/A
reinjectată/A
rejurare/A
remachiată/A
reminimizare/A
remârșăvită/A
reocuparisită/A
repastelizată/A
repledată/A
reprepoziționalizare/A
repufăită/A
rereașezată/A
reridiculizată/A
respiro/c
restereotipare/A
retriumfare/A
retur/C
rezblenduită/A
rezon/M
reîncurajare/A
reînveșmântată/A
riț/C
rodonit/c
rulotă/A
runc/C
ruteniu/c
răsuflu/C
sandal/C
saprofitism/c
saxofon/M
schilodă/A
schit/C
sebum/c
seif/C
serpentin/c
setaveraj/M
sex/C
sibilă/A
sigilion/M
simpozion/M
sinergism/c
sipet/C
sol/C
sovietism/c
sovon/M
sperjură/A
spital/C
stilou/C
storax/c
stufăriș/C
subsecțiune/A
sujet/C
supercampion/M
survol/C
săcușor/c
tact/C
tahigrafie/A
talon/M
tango/C
tartufism/c
taxicamion/M
telefon/M
teletax/c
telex/C
tendon/M
tetanism/c
tetragon/M
ticnă/A
timar/C
tiratron/M
toci/c
ton/M
torpedo/C
transformism/c
trening/C
tresă/A
triatlon/M
tricot/c
triumf/C
tromblon/M
trust/c
tur/C
ucu/C
uloragie/A
undelemn/c
uranism/c
urinal/M
vagonetaj/C
veleitarism/c
velutină/A
veston/M
vicleșug/C
videofon/M
vitalism/c
viziofon/M
vodevil/C
vremuită/A
vulcanism/c
week-end/C
zabaion/c
zbeng/C
zelotism/c
zovon/M
zugrăvită/A
zuzuit/C
zădar/c
încăibărată/A
întristată/A
șagrin/C
șezut/c
șif/C
șifon/M
șort/C
ștras/C
șușotit/c
țestoasă/A
ținc/C
țitron/M
